test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-almaaj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - ålmáj: # N_CONTR_AJA (no grade alternations in normative version)
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Nom: ålmáj
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Gen: [ålmá, ålbmá]
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Acc: [ålmáv, ålbmáv]
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Ill: [ålmáj, ålbmáj]
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Ine: [ålmán, ålbmán]
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Ela: [ålmást, ålmás, ålbmást, ålbmás]
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Com: [ålmájn, ålbmájn]
    ålmáj+N+Pl+Nom: [ålmá, ålbmá]
    ålmáj+N+Pl+Gen: [ålmáj, ålbmáj]
    ålmáj+N+Pl+Acc: [ålmájd, ålbmájd]
    ålmáj+N+Pl+Ill: [ålmájda, ålbmájda]
    ålmáj+N+Pl+Ine: [ålmájn, ålbmájn]
    ålmáj+N+Pl+Ela: [ålmájst, ålmájs, ålbmájst, ålbmájs]
    ålmáj+N+Pl+Com: [ålmáj, ålmájgum, ålbmáj, ålbmájgum]
    ålmáj+N+Ess: [ålmán, ålbmán]
    ålmáj+N+Abe: [ålmádak, ålbmádak]
